Wisconsin, session 2025, SB751.
do enact as follows:SB751,11Section 1. 36.09 (1) (e) of the statutes is amended to read:SB751,2,14236.09 (1) (e) Subject to par. (em), sub. (3) (c), and s. 36.17 (1), the board shall 3appoint a president of the system; a chancellor for each institution; a dean for each 4college campus; the state geologist; the director of the laboratory of hygiene; the 5director of the psychiatric institute; the state cartographer; and the requisite 6number of officers, other than the vice presidents, associate vice presidents, and 7assistant vice presidents of the system; faculty; academic staff; and other employees 8and fix the salaries, subject to the limitations under par. (j) and s. 230.12 (3) (e), the 9duties and the term of office for each. The board shall fix the salaries, subject to the 10limitations under par. (j) and s. 230.12 (3) (e), and the duties for each chancellor, 11vice president, associate vice president, and assistant vice president of the system. 12No sectarian or partisan tests or any tests based upon race, religion, national 13origin, or sex shall ever be allowed or exercised in the appointment of the employees 14of the system.SB751,215Section 2. 36.09 (1) (em) of the statutes is amended to read:SB751,3,71636.09 (1) (em) Neither the board nor any institution may adopt any policy or 1promulgate any rule that requires the board, the president, or a chancellor, as 2applicable, to consider for appointment as president of the system, chancellor, or 3vice chancellor to a position listed in s. 36.17 (2) or as a dean, associate dean, or 4assistant dean only those individuals who are faculty members of the system or 5another institution of higher education, who have been granted tenure within the 6system or another institution of higher education, or who hold the highest level of 7academic degree in a field of study or profession.SB751,38Section 3. 36.09 (3) (c) of the statutes is created to read:SB751,3,15936.09 (3) (c) Neither a chancellor nor the board may exclude from 10consideration for appointment as a dean, associate dean, or academic department 11chairperson at an institution a full-time faculty member or full-time academic staff 12member with instructional or research responsibilities on the basis that the faculty 13or academic staff member has not been granted tenure, is appointed for a 14probationary term, or does not hold the highest level of academic degree in a field of 15study or profession.SB751,416Section 4. 36.09 (4) of the statutes is renumbered 36.09 (4) (b) and amended 17to read:SB751,3,211836.09 (4) (b) The faculty of each institution, subject to the responsibilities and 19powers of the board, the president, and the chancellor of such institution, shall have 20the primary responsibility for advising the chancellor regarding academic and 21educational activities and faculty personnel matters. TheSB751,3,2422(c) The faculty of each institution shall have the right to determine their own 23faculty organizational structure and to select representatives to participate in 24institutional governance, except that the as follows:SB751,4,311. The faculty of each institution shall ensure that faculty in academic 2disciplines related to science, technology, engineering, and mathematics are 3adequately represented in the faculty organizational structure.SB751,54Section 5. 36.09 (4) (a) and (c) 2. of the statutes are created to read:SB751,4,8536.09 (4) (a) 1. Notwithstanding s. 36.05 (8) and subject to subd. 2., in this 6subsection, “faculty” means all individuals who have at least a 50 percent 7appointment and whose job duties consist primarily of teaching or research or who 8are serving as an academic department, center, or program chairperson or director.SB751,4,1292. Faculty status under this paragraph does not confer rank or tenure or 10convert an academic staff appointment into a faculty appointment, but 11instructional academic staff are considered faculty for the purpose of this 12subsection.SB751,4,1613(c) 2. The faculty may not limit eligibility of faculty members to serve on or be 14the chairperson or director of a faculty committee, center, academic department, or 15program on the basis of a faculty member’s rank, tenure, appointment to a faculty 16title, or terminal degree attainment.SB751,617Section 6. 36.09 (4m) of the statutes is amended to read:SB751,5,21836.09 (4m) Academic staff. The academic staff members of each institution, 19subject to the responsibilities and powers of the board, the president, the chancellor, 20and, subject to sub. (4), the faculty of the institution, shall have the primary 21responsibility for advising the chancellor regarding the formulation and review, and 22shall be represented in the development, of all policies and procedures concerning 23academic staff members, including academic staff personnel matters. The Subject 24to sub. (4), the academic staff members of each institution shall have the right to 1organize themselves in a manner they determine and to select their representatives 2to participate in institutional governance.SB751,73Section 7. 36.17 (1) of the statutes is amended to read:SB751,5,10436.17 (1) An appointment to a position listed in sub. (2) shall be a limited 5appointment and the appointment shall, except as provided in s. 36.09 (2) (a) and 6(3) (b), be made by the board and shall be at the pleasure of the board. 7Notwithstanding s. 36.09 (1) (f), the board may not delegate its authority to make 8limited appointments. A faculty member who has been granted tenure or a person 9holding an academic staff appointment under s. 36.15 shall not lose that 10appointment by accepting a limited appointment.SB751,811Section 8. 36.17 (2) of the statutes is amended to read:SB751,5,181236.17 (2) Limited appointments apply to the following positions: president, 13provost, vice president, senior vice president, associate vice president, assistant 14vice president, chancellor, vice chancellor, associate chancellor, assistant chancellor, 15associate vice chancellor, assistant vice chancellor, college campus dean, secretary 16of the board, associate secretary of the board, assistant secretary of the board, trust 17officer and assistant trust officer and such other administrative positions as the 18board determines at the time of the appointment.SB751,919Section 9. 36.17 (3) and (4) of the statutes are created to read:SB751,5,212036.17 (3) The board shall approve a title, salary, and position description for 21each limited appointment.SB751,5,2422(4) The board shall include in the annual report under s. 36.11 (54) (b) the 23title, salary, and position description for each limited appointment and the number 24of limited appointments at each institution.SB751,101Section 10. Initial applicability.SB751,6,32(1) The treatment of ss. 36.09 (1) (em) and (3) (c) and 36.17 (1) and (2) first 3applies to appointments made on the effective date of this subsection.SB751,6,44